Maine, session 132, LD1659.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §3374 is enacted to read:
§3374. Electric Vehicle Firefighting Fund
1. Fund established. The Electric Vehicle Firefighting Fund, referred to in this section
as "the fund," is established as a nonlapsing fund that is administered by the commission
to provide funds to fire departments in the State to purchase equipment and provide training
related to electric vehicle fires.
2. Grant program. The commission shall establish criteria to award grants to fire
departments from the fund. The commission may adopt rules to implement this subsection.
Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5,
chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
3. Procedure. A fire department may apply to the commission for a grant. The
commission shall evaluate each application pursuant to the criteria developed in subsection
2 and, to the extent funds are available, shall award grants from the fund to support the
purchase of equipment or training related to electric vehicle fires.
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA c. 727 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 727
ELECTRIC VEHICLE FEE
§4961. Electric vehicle fee
1. Fee imposed. A fee of $250 is levied upon the sale in this State of a new or used
battery electric vehicle or plug-in hybrid electric vehicle by a dealer. For purposes of this
chapter, "dealer" has the same meaning as in Title 29-A, section 851, subsection 2. For
purposes of this subsection, "battery electric vehicle" and "plug-in hybrid electric vehicle"
have the same meaning as in Title 35-A, section 10126, subsection 1, paragraphs A and D,
respectively.
2. Collection of revenue. On or before the 15th day of each month, the Secretary of
State shall collect on behalf of the State Tax Assessor the revenue received by the dealer
pursuant to subsection 1. The revenue collected must be deposited into the Electric Vehicle
Firefighting Fund established by Title 5, section 3374.